Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.44.260

Destruction of records after liquidation.

Where any files, records, documents, books of account or other papers have been taken over and are in the possession of the director in connection with the liquidation of any insolvent banks or trust companies under the laws of this state, the director may, in his or her discretion at any time after the expiration of one year from the declaration of the final dividend, or from the date when such liquidation has been entirely completed, destroy any of the files, records, documents, books of account or other papers which may appear to the director to be obsolete or unnecessary for future reference as part of the liquidation and files of his or her office.

[ 1994 c 92 s 130; 1955 c 33 s 30.44.260. Prior: 1925 ex.s. c 55 s 1; RRS s 3277-1. Formerly RCW 30.44.260.]